Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1343
State highway system; department; emergencies; powers.

When, in the opinion of the department, an emergency or unusual condition exists requiring immediate action in order to preserve, continue, open, reopen, or provide for safe conditions on a fragment, portion, or route on the state highway system, the department may make necessary repairs, provide necessary equipment or services, or may contract for such repairs, equipment, or services without calling for competitive bids.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 43, p. 437.